Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-512
Rule 512. Privileged matter disclosed under compulsion or without opportunity to claim privilege.

Evidence of a statement or other disclosure of privileged matter is not admissible against the holder of the privilege if the disclosure was (1) compelled erroneously or (2) made without opportunity to claim the privilege.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 32.